Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1420.02
Federal funds; solicitation and expenditure.

The division is encouraged to solicit and may expend any federal funds which may become available for program administration or any light-density rail line projects allowable under the federal act.

Laws 1980, LB 507, § 22;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 74-1422;

Laws 1991, LB 783, § 24;

Laws 1996, LB 463, § 28.